Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Subpart 1 General Provisions

8-2-180.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Clerk of superior court” means the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the property to which the home is or is to be affixed is located.

“Commissioner” means the state revenue commissioner and includes any county tax commissioner when so authorized by the state revenue commissioner to act on his or her behalf in carrying out the responsibilities of this part.

“Home” means a manufactured home.

“Manufactured home” has the meaning specified in paragraph (4) of Code Section 8-2-160.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-180

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.

Law reviews.

For survey article on real property law for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 397 (2003).

For annual survey of real property law, see
58 Mercer L. Rev. 367 (2006).

8-2-181.
Manufactured home as personal property; requirements for real property status; requirements for Certificate of Permanent Location.

Except as provided in Subpart 1A of this part, a manufactured home shall constitute personal property and shall be subject to the “Motor Vehicle Certificate of Title Act,” Chapter 3 of Title 40, until such time as the home is converted to real property as provided for in this part or as provided in Subpart 1A of this part.

A manufactured home shall become real property if:

The home is or is to be permanently affixed on real property and one or more persons with an ownership interest in the home also has an ownership interest in such real property; and

The owner of the home and the holders of all security interests therein execute and file a Certificate of Permanent Location:

In the real estate records of the county where the real property is located; and

With the commissioner.

The Certificate of Permanent Location shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall include:

The name and address of the owner of the home;

The names and addresses of the holders of any security interest in and of any lien upon the home;

The title number assigned to the home;

A description of the real estate on which the home is or is to be located, including the name of the owner and a reference by deed book and page number to the chain of title of such real property; and

Any other data the commissioner prescribes.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-181

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of real property law, see
58 Mercer L. Rev. 367 (2006).

8-2-182.
Recording of Certificate of Permanent Location; responsibilities of commissioner; notification to tax assessors.

When a Certificate of Permanent Location is properly filed with the clerk of superior court, the clerk shall record such certificate in the same manner as other instruments affecting the real property described in the Certificate of Permanent Location and shall charge and collect the fees usually charged for recording deeds and other instruments relating to real estate. Such certificate shall be indexed under the name of the current owner of the real property in both the grantor and grantee indexes. The clerk shall provide the owner with a certified copy of the Certificate of Permanent Location, reflecting its filing, and shall charge and collect the fees usually charged for the provision of certified copies of documents relating to real estate.

Upon receipt of a certified copy of a properly executed Certificate of Permanent Location, along with the certificate of title, the commissioner shall file and retain a copy of such Certificate of Permanent Location together with all other prior title records related to the home. When a properly executed Certificate of Permanent Location has once been filed, the commissioner shall accept no further title filings with respect to that home, except as may be necessary to correct any errors in the department’s records and except as provided in Subparts 2 and 3 of this part.

When a Certificate of Permanent Location is so filed, the commissioner shall issue to the clerk of the superior court with whom the original Certificate of Permanent Location was filed confirmation by the commissioner that the Certificate of Permanent Location has been so filed and the certificate of title has been surrendered.

Upon receipt of confirmation of the filing of the Certificate of Permanent Location from the commissioner, the clerk of superior court shall provide a copy of the Certificate of Permanent Location to the appropriate board of tax assessors or such other local official as is responsible for the valuation of real property.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-182

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of real property law, see
58 Mercer L. Rev. 367 (2006).

8-2-183.
Status of home as part of real property.

When a Certificate of Permanent Location has been properly filed with the clerk of superior court, a certified copy of the Certificate of Permanent Location is properly filed with the commissioner, and the certificate of title is surrendered, the home shall become for all legal purposes a part of the real property on which it is located. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the home shall be subject to transfer by the owner of the real property, subject to any security interest in the real property and subject to foreclosure of any such interest, in the same manner as and together with the underlying real property.

When a home has become a part of the real property as provided in this part, it shall be unlawful for any person to remove such home from the real property except with the written consent of the owner of the real property and the holders of all security interests in the real property and in strict compliance with the requirements of Subpart 2 of this part. Any person who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-183

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.